Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1810
Demurrer to indictment; when made.

The accused may demur when the facts stated in the indictment do not constitute an offense punishable by the laws of this state, or when the intent is not alleged, when proof of it is necessary to make out the offense charged.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 442, p. 822;

R.S.1913, § 9086;

C.S.1922, § 10111;

C.S.1929, § 29-1809;

R.S.1943, § 29-1810.

Demurrer to information was not properly sustained as to one count of the information. State v. Buttner, 180 Neb. 529, 143 N.W.2d 907 (1966).

Failure to demur is not a waiver where information wholly fails to allege essential element of crime. Nelson v. State, 167 Neb. 575, 94 N.W.2d 1 (1959).

Demurrer would not lie to indictment because it alleged in detail facts leading up to commission of criminal act charged. Kirchman v. State, 122 Neb. 624, 241 N.W. 100 (1932).